Utah statutes.
70A-9a-522.   Maintenance and destruction of records.

(1) The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under Section 70A-9a-515 with respect to all secured parties of record.  The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and:

(a)  if the record was filed or recorded in the filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a):

(i)  by using the entry number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the book and page that the record was filed or recorded; or

(ii)  by the legal description of the real property; or

(b)  if the record was filed in the filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(b), by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(2)  Except to the extent that a statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement.  However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement which complies with Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

